Utah statutes.
54-8c-3.   Information filed with county clerk.

(1)  A public utility shall file with the county clerk of each county in which it has high voltage overhead lines a list containing:

(a)  the name of the public utility owning the high voltage overhead lines;

(b)  the name of any municipality, city, or town where the public utility operates high voltage overhead lines; and

(c)  the name, title, and address of its representative designated to receive calls for activity close to its high voltage overhead lines.

(2)  In counties where an association provided in Section 54-8c-6 is established, the telephone number of the association shall be filed with the county clerk on behalf of all participating public utilities.



Amended by Chapter 39, 1989 General Session

